Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 52
OFFICIALS OF CHURCHES AND RELIGIOUS SOCIETIES

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

Section

7-52-101. Execution of articles of incorporation.

The archbishop, bishop, president, trustee in trust, president of stake, president of congregation, overseer, presiding elder, or clergyman of any church or religious society who has been duly chosen, elected, or appointed in conformity with the constitutions, canons, rites, regulations, or discipline of said church or religious society and in whom shall be vested the legal title to the property of such church or religious society may deliver articles of incorporation to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. The articles shall contain the name of the corporation, the purpose of the corporation, and the name and title of the person in whom is vested the legal title to the property.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 866, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-25-1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2214, § 48, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1406, § 24, effective July 1.

7-52-102. Filing articles - corporate existence.

Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation with the secretary of state, the person subscribing the articles and the person's successor in office by the name or title stated in the articles is a corporation sole, with perpetual succession.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 866, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-25-2.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2214, § 49, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1406, § 25, effective July 1.

7-52-103. Corporate powers.

A corporation sole may hold and maintain real, personal, and mixed property; contract in the same manner and to the same extent as an individual; sue and be sued; acquire real and personal property by purchase, devise, bequest, gift, or otherwise and hold, own, use, lease, assign, convey, or otherwise dispose of the same in like manner and to the same extent as an individual; borrow money, issue notes or other negotiable paper, and secure the money borrowed by mortgage or by deed of trust on said real or personal property or any part thereof; borrow money without security; and perform all other acts in furtherance of the objects and purposes of the corporation not inconsistent with the statutes of this state.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 866, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-25-3.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1407, § 26, effective July 1.

7-52-104. Succession to property upon death, resignation, or removal of person incorporated as corporation sole.

In the event of the death or resignation of the archbishop, bishop, president, trustee in trust, president of stake, president of congregation, overseer, presiding elder, or clergyman who has been incorporated as a corporation sole under sections 7-52-101 and 7-52-102, or such person's removal from office by the person or body having the authority for such removal, the person's successor in office as the corporation sole shall be vested with the title of all property held by the successor's predecessor with the same power and authority over the property, subject to all the legal liabilities and obligations with reference to the property, upon the filing by the secretary of state, pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, of a certificate of the successor's commission or certified copy of the successor's letter of election or appointment. In the interim between the appointment of a successor in office to the corporation sole, the person who is charged by the church or religious society pursuant to its constitution, canons, rites, regulations, or discipline to administer the church or religious society shall be vested with the title to any property held by the corporation sole with like powers and authority upon the filing by the secretary of state, pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, of a certificate of the successor's commission or certified copy of the successor's letter of appointment as such administrator.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 867, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-25-4.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1813, § 13, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1677, § 11, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1407, § 27, effective July 1.

7-52-105. Succession to property on death, resignation, or removal of person not incorporated as corporation sole.

Upon the death, resignation, or removal of an archbishop, bishop, president, trustee in trust, president of stake, president of congregation, overseer, presiding elder, or clergyman who at the time of death, resignation, or removal was holding the title to trust property for the use or benefit of a church or religious society but was not incorporated under this article as a corporation sole, the title to all such property held by such person shall not revert to the grantor nor pass to the heirs of the deceased person but shall be held in abeyance until the person's successor is appointed to fill the vacancy. Upon the appointment of the successor, the title of all the property held by the predecessor immediately vests in the person appointed to fill the vacancy.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 867, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-25-5.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1407, § 28, effective July 1.

7-52-106. Applicability of revised nonprofit corporation act.

Except as this article is specifically in conflict therewith, the provisions of the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, shall be applicable to this article.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 867, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-25-6.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2214, § 50, effective July 1, 2004.